Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1941.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3102(1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3102. Obedience to authorized persons directing traffic.No person shall willfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of:(1) any uniformed police officer, sheriff or constable or, in an emergency, a uniformed firefighter, uniformed fire police or a railroad or street railway police officer;* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516